Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Superintendents

§ 241.
Appointment.

Each supervisory union board, with the advice of the Secretary, may employ a superintendent of schools.

A superintendent shall be employed by written contract for a term not to exceed five years nor less than one year and shall work the number of hours required by contract, performing the duties designated in the contract or assigned by the board. A superintendent of schools may be dismissed for cause or as specified in the contract of employment.

Not later than May 15 of a year in which an incumbent superintendent’s contract of employment expires, the supervisory union board shall meet to renew or act otherwise upon the superintendent’s contract. If a supervisory union employs a superintendent, the supervisory union board shall specify and assign the duties of a superintendent. If the supervisory union board does not hire a superintendent, the board may assign any duties assigned to the superintendent under this title to the school principal or principals in the supervisory union or to other qualified persons designated by the board.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 27; amended

1991, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 82, eff. Jan. 1, 1998;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 242.
Duties of superintendents.

The superintendent shall be the chief executive officer for the supervisory union board and for each school board within the supervisory union, and shall:

Carry out the policies adopted by the school boards relating to the educational or business affairs of the school district or supervisory union, and develop procedures to do so.

Prepare, for adoption by a local school board, plans to achieve the educational goals and objectives established by the school district.

Nominate a candidate for employment by the school district or supervisory union if the vacant position requires a licensed employee; provided, if the appropriate board declines to hire a candidate, then the superintendent shall nominate a new candidate;
(3) (A) Nominate a candidate for employment by the school district or supervisory union if the vacant position requires a licensed employee; provided, if the appropriate board declines to hire a candidate, then the superintendent shall nominate a new candidate;

select nonlicensed employees to be employed by the district or supervisory union; and

dismiss licensed and nonlicensed employees of a school district or the supervisory union as necessary, subject to all procedural and other protections provided by contract, collective bargaining agreement, or provision of State and federal law.

Provide data and information required by the Secretary and by using a format approved by the Secretary to:
(4) (A) Provide data and information required by the Secretary and by using a format approved by the Secretary to:

Report budgetary data for the subsequent school year and fiscal year.

Report all financial operations within the supervisory union to the Secretary and State Board for the preceding school year on or before August 15 of each year.

Report all financial operations for each member school district to the Secretary and State Board for the preceding school year on or before August 15 of each year.

Prepare for each district an itemized report detailing the portion of the proposed supervisory union budget for which the district would be assessed for the subsequent school year identifying the component costs by category and explaining the method by which the district’s share for each cost was calculated; and provide the report to each district at least 14 days before a budget, including the supervisory union assessment, is voted on by the electorate of the district.

Work with the school boards of the member districts to develop and implement policies regarding minimum and optimal average class sizes for regular and career technical education classes. The policies may be supervisory union-wide, may be course- or grade-specific, and may reflect differences among school districts due to geography or other factors.

Arrange for the provision of the professional training required in subsection 561(b) of this title.

Provide for the general supervision of the public schools in the supervisory union or district.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 36

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 3, 2010;

2009, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2013, No. 56

, § 12, eff. May 30, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.500.2.

§ 242a.
Internal financial controls.

The superintendent or his or her designee shall annually, on or before December 31, complete and provide to the supervisory union board and to all member district boards a copy of the document regarding internal financial controls made available by the Auditor of Accounts pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 163(11)

.

The supervisory union board shall review the document provided by the superintendent within two months of receiving it.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.